Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.090

City manager—Department heads—Authority.

The city manager may authorize the head of a department or office responsible to him or her to appoint and remove subordinates in such department or office. Any officer or employee who may be appointed by the city manager, or by the head of a department or office, except one who holds his or her position subject to civil service, may be removed by the manager or other such appointing officer at any time. Subject to the provisions of RCW 35.18.060, the decision of the manager or other appointing officer, shall be final and there shall be no appeal therefrom to any other office, body, or court whatsoever.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2024; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.090. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 7; prior: (i) 1949 c 84 s 2, part; 1943 c 271 s 17, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-26, part. (ii) 1949 c 84 s 3, part; 1943 c 271 s 18, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-27, part.]